Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.84.020 and 2024 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Approved cardiovascular invasive specialist program" or "approved radiologist assistant program" means a school approved by the secretary. The secretary may recognize other organizations that establish standards for radiologist assistant programs or cardiovascular invasive specialist programs and designate schools that meet the organization's standards as approved.(2) "Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of radiologic technology, cardiovascular invasive specialist program, or radiologist assistant program approved by the secretary or a school found to maintain the equivalent of such a course of study as determined by the department. Such school may be operated by a medical or educational institution, and for the purpose of providing any requisite clinical experience, shall be affiliated with one or more general hospitals.(3) "Cardiac or vascular catheterization" means all anatomic or physiological studies of intervention in which the heart, coronary arteries, or vascular system are entered via a systemic vein or artery using a catheter that is manipulated under fluoroscopic visualization.(4) "Department" means the department of health.(5) "Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care practitioner performing services within the person's authorized scope of practice.(6) "Nonionizing radiation" includes radiation such as radiofrequency or microwaves, visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light or ultrasound.(7) "Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under this chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices radiologic technology as a:(a) Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who actually handles X-ray equipment in the process of applying radiation on a human being for diagnostic purposes at the direction of a licensed practitioner((, this)). This includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, with the exception of intravenous contrast procedures, which may be performed under virtual direct supervision;(b) Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human subjects at the direction of a licensed practitioner((, this)). This includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, with the exception of intravenous contrast procedures, which may be performed under virtual direct supervision;(c) Magnetic resonance imaging technologist, who is a person who uses a nonionizing radiation process on a human being by which certain nuclei, when placed in a magnetic field, absorb and release energy in the form of radio waves that are analyzed by a computer thereby producing an image of human anatomy and physiological information at the direction of a licensed practitioner((, this)). This includes parenteral procedures related to radiologic technology when performed under the direct supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, with the exception of intravenous contrast procedures, which may be performed under virtual direct supervision;(d) Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in vitro detection and measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes at the direction of a licensed practitioner;(e) Radiologist assistant, who is an advanced-level certified diagnostic radiologic technologist who assists radiologists by performing advanced diagnostic imaging procedures as determined by rule under levels of supervision defined by the secretary((, this)). This includes but is not limited to enteral and parenteral procedures when performed under the direction of the supervising radiologist, and that these procedures may include injecting diagnostic agents to sites other than intravenous, performing diagnostic aspirations and localizations, and assisting radiologists with other invasive procedures; or(f) Cardiovascular invasive specialist, who is a person who assists in cardiac or vascular catheterization procedures under the personal supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW. This includes parenteral procedures related to cardiac or vascular catheterization including, but not limited to, parenteral procedures involving arteries and veins.(8) "Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing or ((nonionzing))nonionizing radiation upon a human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes.(9) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.(10) "Registered X-ray technician" means a person who is registered with the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the direction of a licensed practitioner and who does not perform parenteral procedures.(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.(12)(a) "Virtual direct supervision" means supervision of a procedure that is furnished under the overall direction and control of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, where the physician is not required to be physically present during the performance of the procedure but is immediately available to assist through real-time audio and visual interactive telecommunications.(b) Virtual direct supervision must comply with all federal and state laws and regulations and local, institutional, site, and facility policies, guidelines, and rules related to telemedicine. Clinical staff with requisite training and qualifications to administer medications in the event of an adverse event must be present at the facility to respond to on-site patient care as needed. The physician performing virtual direct supervision must be within 30 miles of the facility where the procedure is taking place.--- END ---